Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF945.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 HF 945 (2) 91 as/js/md H.F. 945 Section 1. Section 704.13, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 704.13 Immunity. 3 1. A person who is justified in using reasonable force 4 against an aggressor in defense of oneself, another person, 5 or property pursuant to section 704.4 is immune from criminal 6 or prosecution, criminal liability for all damages, and civil 7 liability for all damages incurred by the aggressor pursuant to 8 the application of reasonable force. 9 2. A defendant in a criminal action may file a motion 10 asserting the immunity granted in this section not less than 11 forty-five days before trial. The court shall conduct a 12 pretrial hearing to determine whether the defendant is immune 13 from criminal prosecution. If the court finds that the 14 defendant has established a prima facie claim of immunity, the 15 state shall bear the burden of proof by clear and convincing 16 evidence to overcome the claim of immunity. If the state 17 overcomes the claim of immunity, the case will proceed to trial 18 as provided by the rules of criminal procedure. If the state 19 does not overcome the claim of immunity, the case shall be 20 dismissed with prejudice. 21 3. A defendant in a civil action may raise the immunity 22 granted by this section as an affirmative defense as provided 23 by the rules of civil procedure. 24 4. A defendant in a criminal action may raise any defense 25 or immunity granted by this chapter as a trial defense. The 26 denial of a defendantâs pretrial motion under this section 27 shall not preclude the defendantâs right to raise any 28 affirmative defense or immunity at trial. 29 -1- HF 945 (2) 91 as/js/md 1/ 1